Washington statutes.
RCW 18.240.090

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the uncertified practice, the issuance and denial of certification, and the discipline of persons certified under this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 70 s 10.]